Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1908YH (4) 91 jm/jh H.F. 962 Section 1. Section 422.12C, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The taxes imposed under this subchapter , less the amounts 3 of nonrefundable credits allowed under this subchapter , shall 4 be reduced by a child and dependent care credit equal to the 5 following percentages of the federal child and dependent care 6 credit provided in section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code, 7 without regard to whether or not the federal credit was limited 8 by the taxpayerâs federal tax liability: 9 a. For a taxpayer with net income of less than ten thousand 10 dollars, seventy-five percent. 11 b. For a taxpayer with net income of ten thousand dollars or 12 more but less than twenty thousand dollars, sixty-five percent. 13 c. For a taxpayer with net income of twenty thousand dollars 14 or more but less than twenty-five thousand dollars, fifty-five 15 percent. 16 d. For a taxpayer with net income of twenty-five thousand 17 dollars or more but less than thirty-five thousand dollars , 18 fifty percent. 19 e. For a taxpayer with net income of thirty-five thousand 20 dollars or more but less than forty thousand dollars, forty 21 percent. 22 f. For a taxpayer with net income of forty thousand dollars 23 or more but less than ninety thousand dollars, thirty percent. 24 g. For a taxpayer with net income of ninety thousand dollars 25 or more, zero percent. 26 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 27 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 28 or after that date. 29